Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 1

General Provisions

6-54-101. Division into wards.

The governing board may divide any municipal corporation into as many wards as it may deem necessary.

Code 1858, § 1384 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 17, § 11); Shan., § 1978; mod. Code 1932, § 3393; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-601.

Cross-References. Transportation system, ownership authorized, title 7, ch. 56.

Attorney General Opinions. Cities and counties lack statutory authority to regulate mortgage transactions, OAG 03-016, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/11/03).

6-54-102. Redistricting into new wards.

Municipalities may redistrict into new wards whenever, for proper reasons, they deem it expedient so to do.

Acts 1875, ch. 92, § 15; Shan., § 1908; Code 1932, § 3319; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-602.

6-54-103. Owning real estate outside limits.

All municipal corporations may, for corporate purposes, hold real estate beyond their limits.

Code 1858, § 1363 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 28, § 1); Acts 1875, ch. 92, § 17; Shan., § 1922; Code 1932, § 3334; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-603.

Cross-References. Foreign-trade zones, title 7, ch. 85.

6-54-104. Regulation of electrical work.

All incorporated cities, towns, and villages, however formed, are empowered to regulate the business of electricians and electrical work in such cities, towns, or villages, and to enforce efficiency of same, and to that end to pass all ordinances necessary to carry out and enforce the powers delegated.

Acts 1925, ch. 83, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1915a1; mod. Code 1932, § 3327; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-611.

Attorney General Opinions. Proposed Electricians' Licensing Act of 1998 does not require union membership, OAG 98-050, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 50 (2/23/98).

6-54-105. Regulation of sale of commodities.

All corporate towns may pass laws to require articles usually sold by dry or heaped measure, to be sold by weight, within their corporate limits.

Code 1858, § 1364 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 55, § 10); Shan., § 1923; Code 1932, § 3335; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-612.

6-54-106. Regulation of powder magazines.

The governing body of any incorporated municipality may authorize the building of powder magazines at any safe and prudent distance from the limits of the corporation. When it gives such authority, it shall be by order upon its records, designating and appointing the places within its county where such magazines may be erected, in which it shall be lawful to deposit and keep gunpowder. The corporate authorities shall adopt such regulations in regard to the construction of such magazines as may, in their opinion, best secure the community from danger.

Code 1858, §§ 1395-1397 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 169, §§ 1, 2); Shan., §§ 1992-1994; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3494-3496; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-613.

Cross-References. Municipal regulation of gunpowder storage, § 68-101-101.

Obstructing highway or other passageway, § 39-17-307.

Preemption by state regulation, § 39-17-1314.

6-54-107. Interest of officer in municipal contracts prohibited.

No person holding office under any municipal corporation shall, during the time for which such person was elected or appointed, be capable of contracting with such corporation for the performance of any work that is to be paid for out of the treasury. Nor shall such person be capable of holding or having any other direct interest in such a contract. “Direct interest” means any contract with any business in which the official is the sole proprietor, a partner, or the person having the controlling interest. “Controlling interest” includes the individual with the ownership or control of the largest number of outstanding shares owned by any single individual or corporation.

No officer in a municipality shall be indirectly interested in any contract to which the municipality is a party unless the officer publicly acknowledges such officer's interest. “Indirectly interested” means any contract in which the officer is interested but not directly so, but includes contracts where the officer is directly interested but is the sole supplier of goods or services in a municipality.

Any member of a local governing body of a municipality who is also an employee of the same municipality may vote on matters in which such member has a conflict of interest if the member informs the governing body immediately prior to the vote as follows:

“Because I am an employee of (name of governmental unit), I have a conflict of interest in the proposal about to be voted. However, I declare that my argument and my vote answer only to my conscience and to my obligation to my constituents and the citizens this body represents.”

In the event a member of a local governing body of a municipality has a conflict of interest in a matter to be voted upon by the body, the member may abstain for cause by announcing such to the presiding officer. Any member of a local governing body of a municipality who abstains from voting for cause on any issue coming to a vote before the body shall not be counted for the purpose of determining a majority vote.

The vote of any person having a conflict of interest who does not inform the governing body of such conflict as provided in subdivision (c)(1) shall be void if challenged in a timely manner. As used in this subdivision (c)(3), “timely manner” means during the same meeting at which the vote was cast and prior to the transaction of any further business by the body.

Nothing in this subsection (c) alters, amends, or otherwise affects § 12-4-101(a). In the event of any conflict between this subsection (c) and § 12-4-101(a), § 12-4-101(a) shall prevail.

The legislative body of any metropolitan form of government or charter form of government may opt out of this subsection (c) by resolution.

Code 1858, § 1398 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 7, § 1); Shan., § 1995; Code 1932, § 3497; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-626; Acts 1983, ch. 388, §§ 2, 6; 1985, ch. 236, § 1; 1986, ch. 765, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 1072, § 4.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, in (c), substituted “municipality” for “county or a municipality” throughout, substituted “the same municipality” for “such county or municipality” in the introductory language, rewrote the first sentence in (4) which read: “Nothing in this subsection (c) shall be construed as altering, amending or otherwise affecting § 12-4-101(a).”; and added (5).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1072, § 6. May 20, 2016.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 71.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1954 Tennessee Survey, 7 Vand. L. Rev. 881 (1954).

Attorney General Opinions. Dual membership on city council and hospital board, OAG 98-004, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 4 (1/5/98).

Utility board employee serving as mayor or city council member, OAG 98-0130, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 129 (7/27/98).

Under T.C.A. § 6-54-107(a), a city judge is prohibited from contracting with the city for the performance of work to be paid for out of the treasury, and this prohibition includes acting as the city attorney, either as an independent contractor or as an employee of the city, OAG 02-106, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 111 (10/01/02).

6-54-108. Penalty for unlawful interest of officer.

Every officer of such corporation who shall unlawfully be concerned in making such contract, or who shall unlawfully pay money upon the same to or for any person declared incapable in § 6-54-107, shall forfeit the amount so paid; and such officer shall be jointly and severally liable to an action for the same, which action may be prosecuted by any citizen of the corporation in its name.

Code 1858, § 1399 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 7, § 1); Shan., § 1996; mod. Code 1932, § 3498; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-627; Acts 1983, ch. 388, § 3.

6-54-109. Municipal control of utilities.

It is not lawful for:

Any corporation chartered or authorized to build or operate, or operating, a street railway, whether by steam, electricity, or otherwise;

Any corporation chartered or authorized to manufacture or furnish, or furnishing gas, electricity, or other substance for the lighting of the streets or public places of any town or city, or for the use or consumption by the inhabitants of such town or city; or

Any corporation chartered or authorized to supply, or supplying, any town or city or the inhabitants thereof with water;

to acquire the franchises or property of any similar corporation carrying on its operations with any city or town, or partly in such city or town and in the territory adjacent to same, by consolidation, purchase, lease or other mode, except only by and with the permission and consent, expressed officially in writing, of the municipal government of the city or town in which the corporation whose franchises or property is being acquired carries on its business, wholly or in part, and then only upon such terms and conditions as the municipal government may prescribe; provided, that such terms and conditions shall not violate any law.

Acts 1889, ch. 70, § 1; Shan., § 2047; Acts 1925, ch. 50, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 4081; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 6-646, 48-610.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

Attorney General Opinions. Providing natural gas within city limits. OAG 14-42, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 43 (4/1/14).

6-54-110. Oil and natural gas — Powers and duties.

Notwithstanding any other law, a municipality, its agencies or divisions thereof, may within or without the state engage in investigating, exploring, prospecting, drilling, and mining for and producing natural gas and oil and mineral by-products thereof, and construct the appropriate facilities to produce, save, take care of, maintain, treat and transport natural gas and oil and mineral by-products thereof, or to contract for same with any person, federal agency, municipality or public or private corporation.

No municipality, its agencies, or division thereof, is granted any additional power of eminent domain to carry out this section.

Acts 1974, ch. 627, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-661.

Cross-References. Municipal gas companies, title 7, ch. 39.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of municipal utility division to furnish propane service, OAG 98-0175, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 175 (8/28/98).

6-54-111. Appropriation of funds for nonprofit organizations.

The legislative body of each municipality may appropriate funds for the financial aid of any nonprofit charitable organization or any nonprofit civic organization in accordance with the guidelines required by subsection (b).

For the purposes of this section, “nonprofit charitable organization” is one in which no part of the net earnings inures or may lawfully inure to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual and that provides year-round services benefiting the general welfare of the residents of the municipalities.

For the purposes of this section, “nonprofit civic organization” means a civic organization exempt from taxation pursuant to § 501(c)(4) or (c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(4), (c)(6)), which operates primarily for the purpose of bringing about civic betterments and social improvements through efforts to maintain and increase employment opportunities in the municipality by promoting industry, trade, commerce, tourism and recreation by inducing manufacturing, industrial, governmental, educational, financial, service, commercial, recreational, and agricultural enterprises to locate in or remain in the municipality. The statement of public policy set forth in Acts 1955, ch. 209, § 3 is hereby incorporated into and made a part of this section, and it is hereby determined and declared that appropriations authorized by this section are needed to relieve the emergency created by the continuing migration from Tennessee and its municipalities of a large number of its citizens in order to find employment elsewhere, and to enable the municipalities of the state to assist nonprofit organizations in furthering the economic development, social welfare, and common good of its residents.

The comptroller of the treasury shall devise standard procedures to assist a municipality in the disposition of funds that are appropriated under this section. Each legislative body of a municipality shall devise guidelines directing for what purpose the appropriated money may be spent. These guidelines shall provide generally that any funds appropriated shall be used to promote the general welfare of the residents of the municipality. Any funds appropriated under this section shall be used and expended under the direction and control of the legislative body of a municipality in conjunction with the guidelines and procedures of the comptroller of the treasury.

Any nonprofit organization that desires financial assistance from a municipality shall file with the city clerk a copy of an annual report of its business affairs and transactions that includes, but is not limited to:

Either a copy of the entity's most recently completed annual audit or an annual report detailing all receipts and expenditures in a form prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury and prepared and certified by the chief financial officer of such nonprofit organization;

A description of the program that serves the residents of the municipality; and

The proposed use of the municipal assistance.

The report filed pursuant to subdivision (c)(1) shall be open for public inspection during regular business hours of the city clerk's office.

Financial reports shall be available to fiscal officers of the municipality and shall be subject to audit under § 6-56-105.

Appropriations to nonprofit organizations other than charitable organizations may be made only once notices have been published in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality of the intent to make an appropriation to a nonprofit, but not charitable, organization specifying the intended amount of the appropriation and the purposes for which the appropriation will be spent.

Acts 1978, ch. 838, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-662; Acts 1984, ch. 820, §§ 2, 4; 1995, ch. 297, §§ 1, 2; 2017, ch. 123, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 209, § 3, referred to in (a)(2)(B), reads as follows:

“That it is hereby determined and declared that the purpose of this act is to do that which the state welfare demands, and the state public policy requires:

“(a) That the migration and loss of the people of Tennessee, who are compelled to leave the territorial limits of the state, daily, weekly, monthly and yearly to obtain employment and earn a livelihood be retarded and reduced.

“(b) That the conditions of unemployment existing statewide in Tennessee be relieved thereby reducing the evils attendant thereto.

“(c) That the average family income in Tennessee be raised and increased as much as possible, but to an amount at least the average over the United States.

“(d) That a means be provided for the citizens of communities to promote and develop industry in their areas, when it is possible for them to do so in their separate and individual capacities.

“(e) That a balanced economic development highly essential to the welfare of this state be promoted.

“(f) That the reconversion from war time and civil defense economy to peace time pursuits be expedited by a program for readjustment of employment to accord with employment problems necessarily arising from changed conditions.

“(g) That the present and prospective health, safety, morals, pursuit of happiness, right to gainful employment and the general welfare of the citizens demand as a public purpose, the development within Tennessee of commercial, industrial, agricultural and manufacturing enterprises by the several municipalities.

“(h) That the means and measures herein authorized to promote such enterprises are, as a matter of public policy, for the public purposes of the several municipalities, and the state of Tennessee.

“(i) That the present and prospective promotion of health, safety, morals, pursuit of happiness, right to gainful employment, and the general welfare of the state requires the measures that are herein and hereby authorized, and to that end will afford ready and attractive markets for farm and garden products, for the development of natural resources, and for the conversion of raw materials of farm, mine and forest into finished products for the general welfare of each of such municipalities, and the entire people of the state.

“(j) That the accomplishment of the things herein authorized to be done by the several municipalities will give to them local benefits peculiar to each, and general benefits to the entire state.”

Acts 1995, ch. 297, § 3 provided that contributions made by municipalities in the past to the organizations authorized to receive contributions by that act are hereby ratified and approved.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment rewrote (c) which read: “(c) Any nonprofit organization that desires financial assistance from a municipality shall file with the city clerk a copy of an annual report of its business affairs and transactions, which includes, but is not limited to, a copy of an annual audit, a description of the program that serves the residents of the municipality and the proposed use of the municipal assistance. Such report will be open for public inspection during regular business hours of the city clerk's office.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 123, § 3. April 12, 2017.

Attorney General Opinions. Pledge of city appropriations to nonprofit organization, OAG 99-225, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 231 (12/3/99).

6-54-112. Mayors and commissioners — Substitutes to serve on boards, etc.

Any mayor or full-time commissioner of a municipality who serves on a municipal, county, regional board, commission, or authority or development district board, in an appointed, elected, or ex officio capacity, may from time to time designate a person qualified to hold the official's office, a professional staff member of the municipality with appropriate training, or a member of the municipality's governing body to sit in the municipal official's place on the board, commission, or authority.

Any such designee has the same immunities and powers, including the power to vote, as are otherwise conferred on the elected municipal official on the board, commission, or authority.

No such designee may cast more than one (1) vote.

At any meeting attended by the elected municipal official, only the elected municipal official, and not the designee, shall exercise voting power.

Subsection (a) shall not be applicable when there is a charter, private act, ordinance, or general law provision providing for a substitute for the local government official, nor shall subsection (a) apply to boards, commissions, or authorities whose members are appointed by the governor.

Subsection (a) shall not apply to the members of local boards of education.

Acts 1987, ch. 236, § 1; 1989, ch. 169, § 1.

6-54-113. Removal of vegetation and debris from certain lots.

“Municipality,” as used in this section, includes incorporated cities and towns and metropolitan governments.

The authority provided in this section is permissive and not mandatory and may or may not be exercised by a municipality, as each municipality deems appropriate.

If it is determined by the appropriate department or person as designated by the governing body of a municipality that any owner of record of real property has created, maintained or permitted to be maintained on such property the growth of trees, vines, grass, underbrush or the accumulation of debris, trash, litter, or garbage, or any combination of the preceding elements, so as to endanger the health, safety or welfare of other citizens or to encourage the infestation of rats and other harmful animals, the appropriate department or person shall provide notice to the owner of record to remedy the condition immediately. The notice shall be given by United States mail, addressed to the last known address of the owner of record. When an attempt at notification by United States mail fails or no valid last known address exists for the owner of record, the municipality may publish the notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the property sits for no less than two (2) consecutive issues or personally deliver the notice to the owner of record. For purposes of this section, such publication shall constitute receipt of notice effective on the date of the second publication of the notice and personal delivery shall constitute receipt of notice immediately upon delivery. The notice shall state that the owner of the property is entitled to a hearing. The notice shall be written in plain language and shall also include, but not be limited to, the following elements:

A brief statement of this section, which shall contain the consequences of failing to remedy the noted condition;

The person, office, address and telephone number of the department or person giving notice;

A cost estimate for remedying the noted condition, which shall be in conformity with the standards of cost in the community; and

A place wherein the notified party may return a copy of the notice, indicating the desire for a hearing.

If the person fails or refuses to remedy the condition within ten (10) days after receiving the notice, the appropriate department or person shall immediately cause the condition to be remedied or removed at a cost in conformity with reasonable standards and the cost thereof assessed against the owner of the property. The municipality may collect the costs assessed against the owner through an action for debt filed in any court of competent jurisdiction. The municipality may bring one (1) action for debt against more than one (1) or all of the owners of properties against whom such costs have been assessed, and the fact that multiple owners have been joined in one (1) action shall not be considered by the court as a misjoinder of parties. Upon the filing of the notice with the office of the register of deeds of the county in which the property lies, the costs shall be a lien on the property in favor of the municipality, second only to liens of the state, county and municipality for taxes, any lien of the municipality for special assessments, and any valid lien, right or interest in such property duly recorded or duly perfected by filing, prior to the filing of such notice. These costs shall be collected by the municipal tax collector or county trustee at the same time and in the same manner as property taxes are collected. If the owner fails to pay the costs, they may be collected at the same time and in the same manner as delinquent property taxes are collected and shall be subject to the same penalty and interest as delinquent property taxes.

When the owner of an owner-occupied residential property fails or refuses to remedy the condition within ten (10) days after receiving the notice, the appropriate department or person shall immediately cause the condition to be remedied or removed at a cost in accordance with reasonable standards in the community, with these costs to be assessed against the owner of the property. Subdivision (c)(1)(A) shall apply to the collection of costs against the owner of an owner-occupied residential property, except that the municipality shall wait until cumulative charges for remediation equal or exceed five hundred dollars ($500) before filing the notice with the register of deeds and the charges becoming a lien on the property. After this threshold has been met and the lien attaches, charges for costs for which the lien attached are collectible as provided in subdivision (c)(1)(A) for these charges.

If the person who is the owner of record is a carrier engaged in the transportation of property or is a utility transmitting communications, electricity, gas, liquids, steam, sewerage or other materials, the ten-day period specified in subdivision (a)(1) shall be twenty (20) days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays.

The municipal governing body or the appropriate department, or both, may make any rules and regulations necessary for the administration and enforcement of this section. The municipality shall provide for a hearing upon request of the person aggrieved by the determination made pursuant to subsection (b). A request for a hearing shall be made within ten (10) days following the receipt of the notice issued pursuant to subsection (b). Failure to make the request within this time shall without exception constitute a waiver of the right to a hearing.

Any person aggrieved by an order or act of the board, agency or commission under this subsection (d) may seek judicial review of the order or act. The time period established in subsection (c) shall be stayed during the pendency of a hearing.

The provisions of this section are in addition and supplemental to, and not in substitution for, similar authority in any municipality's charter or other applicable law.

In the event a privately owned cemetery would otherwise meet the requirements of this section, and if a Boy Scout troop or other organization were to remedy the conditions existing on such property, the municipality shall be prohibited from filing a lien against such property for the value of the work performed by such organization. Such organization shall be immune from any legal action for damages, and no cause of action for civil or criminal liability may be brought by the owner of record of the cemetery or descendants of those buried in the cemetery against such organization, so long as reasonable care is taken by such organization not to violate § 46-2-105, § 46-3-108 [repealed], or any other provision of law, rule or regulation.

As used in this subsection (g):

“Community organization” means a community-oriented organization or group including, but not limited to, a school group, church youth group, neighborhood preservation nonprofit corporation, or community support group; and

“Vacant property” means property on which no building exists or on which a building exists but any such building is no longer utilized for any business, commercial or residential purposes.

Except as provided in subsection (f), if a person fails to remedy the condition on vacant property within the time period prescribed by subsection (c), subject to any stay as provided in subsection (d), upon the adoption of a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the municipal legislative body of any municipality located in any county having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, to implement this subsection (g) within any such municipality, a community organization shall be entitled to petition the municipality to enter upon such vacant property to remedy the conditions identified in subsection (b). Upon the filing of such a petition, the municipality is authorized to contract with such community organization for such purposes. The contract shall provide for the manner in which the community organization shall be compensated for remedying the conditions pursuant to such contract. Any municipality that contracts with a community organization for such purposes shall be absolutely immune from any liability to any and all persons and for damage to the vacant property for conditions remedied by the community organization. No monetary liability and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against the municipality for acts of omission or commission of such community organization for conditions remedied pursuant to such contract.

Acts 1988, ch. 564, § 1; 1989, ch. 100, § 1; 1991, ch. 515, §§ 1, 3; 1993, ch. 210, § 1; 2007, ch. 382, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 923, § 3; 2014, ch. 840, § 1; 2014, ch. 963, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Former § 46-3-108, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 1012, § 6, effective January 1, 2007.

Acts 2014, ch. 963, § 5 provided that the secretary of state is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment by ch. 963, effective January 1, 2015, inserted “neighborhood preservation nonprofit corporation,” preceding “or community support group” in (g)(1)(A).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 963, § 6. January 1, 2015; provided that for the purpose of promulgating rules and making necessary provisions for the implementation of the act, this act shall take effect May 19, 2014.

Cross-References. Removal of overgrown vegetation or accumulating debris by county, § 5-1-115.

6-54-114. Municipal civil service board — Members — Qualifications — Appointment.

Notwithstanding any municipal charter to the contrary, each member of a municipal civil service board shall be a domiciled resident of the municipality that the board serves for at least one (1) year prior to appointment. During a member's term of office, no such member shall engage in any type of business with the municipality or any employee of such municipality.

Notwithstanding any municipal charter or ordinance to the contrary, all members of any municipal civil service board in any county with a population greater than three hundred thousand (300,000), created by ordinance or charter, shall be appointed by the mayor of the municipality which the board serves. Such appointments shall be subject to confirmation by the municipal legislative body. At least one (1) member shall be a woman and one (1) member shall be a minority citizen.

This section shall not apply to municipalities with a mayor-aldermen form of government.

Acts 1989, ch. 463, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 463, § 2 provided that the enactment of this section by that act shall not abridge the term of any incumbent member of a board affected by its provisions, but upon the expiration of any term, or upon any current vacancy or May 31, 1989, or any future vacancy on such board after May 31, 1989, such vacancy shall be filled in accordance with its terms.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

6-54-115. Exemption of property from seizure.

The public property of every municipality, of every character and description, used for strictly municipal purposes, is exempt from seizure by attachment, execution or other legal process; nor shall municipal funds in the hands of its treasurer or depository be subject to garnishment or other legal process, except as is elsewhere provided. There shall be no priority, by pledge of property or taxes, given to creditors.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 2.

6-54-116. Joint building inspectors in certain municipalities.

Two (2) or more municipalities, neither of which exceeds twenty-five thousand (25,000) in population, may engage jointly one (1) building inspector, and make an agreement specifying how this inspector shall be paid for the services and how the inspector's time or services shall be allocated to the respective municipalities. Municipalities shall have this authority regardless of any other law or charter provision to the contrary.

“Municipalities” means incorporated cities and towns.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities see Volume 13 and its supplement.

6-54-117. Construction of entertainment facilities.

All municipal corporations have the power and are authorized to purchase land and install therein roads and streets and water, sewer, electric and other utilities for the purpose of aiding in the construction and development therein of performance halls, auditoriums, theaters, or other entertainment facilities, and to issue their bonds or notes to finance in whole or in part the costs of such land and improvements, in accordance with and subject to the requirements of title 9, chapter 21, and title 13, chapter 16, and to exercise all the powers set forth therein as it relates to such construction and development.

Acts 1993, ch. 478, § 3.

6-54-118. Municipal relationships with industrial development corporations.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a municipality may appropriate funds, which may be funds borrowed by the municipality under applicable law, for the purpose of making a loan, with reasonable interest assessed, or a contribution to an eligible industrial development corporation, as defined in subsection (c), for the purpose of economic development or industrial development, or both.

Without limiting subdivision (a)(1), a municipality may also agree, for the period of time that the municipality may determine pursuant to an interlocal agreement entered into under § 12-9-104, that relates to the joint development or operation of an industrial park or a business park, to contribute to any eligible industrial development corporation that is identified in the interlocal agreement as the entity responsible for the development or operation of the industrial park or business park an amount equal to the property taxes that the municipality receives with respect to the property, including personal property, located within the industrial park or business park.

Any amounts contributed to an industrial development corporation pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) shall be deemed revenues of the industrial development corporation, which may be used for any lawful purpose of the industrial development corporation.

Without limiting subdivisions (a)(1)-(3), any industrial development corporation that is identified in an interlocal agreement as the entity responsible for the development or operation of an industrial park or business park shall be authorized to distribute to any municipality that is a party to the interlocal agreement any revenues received by the industrial development corporation with respect to the industrial park or business park that are in excess of the amounts that are needed to pay the expenses of developing and operating the industrial park or business park.

Without limiting the authorization provided under any otherwise applicable law, on or before 11:59 p.m., January 1, 2012, a municipality located in a tier 3 enhancement county as defined in § 67-4-2109(a)(2) as of June 1, 2011, acting through the authorization of the board of public utilities or other board or supervisory body having responsibility for the electric department or gas department of the municipality, may loan funds from the electric department or gas department to an eligible industrial development corporation for the purpose of economic development or industrial development, or both; provided, that:

Prior to making any loan pursuant to this subsection (b), the municipality shall submit the loan agreement to the comptroller of the treasury, or the comptroller's designee, for approval based upon a review of the financial condition of the electric or gas department, the department's available reserves, the collateral provided to the department, and the terms and conditions of the loan documents; and

The principal amount of any loan made pursuant to this subsection (b) shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

For purposes of this section:

“Eligible industrial development corporation” means:

Any industrial development corporation incorporated in the county in which the municipality is located;

Any industrial development corporation formed jointly by the municipality and other municipalities pursuant to § 7-53-104(b); and

Any industrial development corporation that has been identified in an interlocal agreement to which a municipality is a party as the entity that will be responsible for the development or operation of an industrial park or business park; and

“Municipality” shall have the same meaning as in § 7-53-101.

Acts 1993, ch. 197, § 1; 2006, ch. 670, § 1; 2011, ch. 385, §§ 1, 2.

6-54-119. Building safety and other standardized codes incorporated by reference — Citations.

If the legislative body of any municipality or any agency or instrumentality thereof incorporates by reference a building code, safety and health code, or any other standardized code or document, a copy of such code or document shall be obtained and retained as a public record by the respective legislative body, agency or instrumentality.

If any person is cited by the municipal legislative body or any agency or instrumentality thereof as having violated a building code, safety and health code, or any other standardized code or document that has been incorporated by reference pursuant to subsection (a), a notation shall be included in such citation identifying with specificity where a copy of the respective code or document is located and the hours during which such person has the opportunity to read or inspect such code or document.

Acts 1993, ch. 478, § 2.